Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB798.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 914. Possession of firearm or other dangerous weapon in municipal building.(a) Offense defined.--If the governing body of a municipality adopts an ordinance which prohibits the possession of a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a municipal building, a person commits an offense if the person:(1) knowingly possesses a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a municipal building or knowingly causes a firearm or other dangerous weapon to be present in a municipal building; or123456789101112131415161718 (2) knowingly possesses a firearm or other dangerous weapon in a municipal building with the intent that the firearm or other dangerous weapon be used in the commission of a crime or knowingly causes a firearm or other dangerous weapon to be present in a municipal building with the intent that the firearm or other dangerous weapon be used in the commission of a crime.(b) Grading.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), an offense under subsection (a)(1) is a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) An offense under subsection (a)(2) is a misdemeanor of the first degree.(3) An offense under subsection (a)(1) is a summary offense if the person was carrying a firearm under section 6106(b) (relating to firearms not to be carried without a license) or 6109 (relating to licenses) and failed to check the firearm under subsection (e) prior to entering the municipal building.(c) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) The lawful performance of official duties by an officer, agent or employee of the United States, the Commonwealth or a political subdivision who is authorized by law to engage in or supervise the prevention, detection, investigation or prosecution of any violation of law.(2) The lawful performance of official duties by a municipal official.(3) The carrying of rifles and shotguns by instructors and participants in a course of instruction provided by the Pennsylvania Game Commission under 34 Pa.C.S. § 2704 (relating to eligibility for license).20250SB0798PN0847 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Associations of veteran soldiers and their auxiliaries or members of organized armed forces of the United States or the Commonwealth, including reserve components, when engaged in the performance of ceremonial duties with municipal approval.(5) The carrying of a dangerous weapon or firearm unloaded and in a secure wrapper by an attorney who seeks to employ the dangerous weapon or firearm as an exhibit or as a demonstration and who possesses written authorization from the municipality to bring the dangerous weapon or firearm into the municipal building.(d) Posting of notice.--Notice of the provisions of subsections (a) and (e) shall be posted conspicuously at each public entrance to each municipal building, and a person may not be convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(1) with respect to a municipal building if the notice was not posted at each public entrance to the municipal building unless the person had actual notice of the provisions of subsection (a).(e) Facilities for checking firearms or other dangerous weapons.--Within 30 days of the adoption of the ordinance under subsection (a), each municipality shall make available at or within the municipal building lockers or similar facilities at no charge or cost for the temporary checking of firearms by persons carrying firearms under section 6106(b) or 6109 or for the checking of other dangerous weapons that are not otherwise prohibited by law. A person checking a firearm, dangerous weapon or an item deemed to be a dangerous weapon at a municipal building shall be issued a receipt. Notice of the location of the facility shall be posted as required under subsection (d).(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following 20250SB0798PN0847 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dangerous weapon." A bomb, an explosive or incendiary device or material when possessed with intent to use or to provide such material to commit an offense, graded as a misdemeanor of the third degree or higher, grenade, blackjack, sandbag, metal knuckles, dagger, knife (the blade of which is exposed in an automatic way by switch, push-button, spring mechanism or otherwise) or other implement for the infliction of serious bodily injury which serves no common lawful purpose."Firearm." Any weapon, including a starter gun, which will or is designed to expel a projectile or projectiles by the action of an explosion, expansion of gas or escape of gas. The term does not include any device designed or used exclusively for the firing of stud cartridges, explosive rivets or similar industrial ammunition."Municipal building." The meeting place of the governing body of a municipality."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or home rule municipality.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0798PN0847 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021